Maryland, session 2025, HB0473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–3602.
(a) There is a program of Maryland Community College Promise Scholarships in
the State that are awarded under this subtitle.
18–3604.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, each recipient may
hold the award until the earlier of:
(i) 3 years after first enrolling [as]:
1. AS a candidate for a NONCREDIT vocational certificate[,
a];
2. IN A SEQUENCE OF CREDIT OR NONCREDIT COURSES
– 1 –

Ch. 377 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
LEADING TO LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION;
3. IN CREDIT OR NONCREDIT COURSES THAT ARE
REQUIRED FOR PARTICIPATION IN A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM;
4. AS A CANDIDATE FOR A certificate[,]; or [an]
5. AS A FULL–TIME CANDIDATE FOR AN associate’s degree
at a community college in the State; [or]
(ii) 6 YEARS AFTER FIRST ENROLLING AS A PART–TIME
CANDIDATE FOR AN ASSOCIATE’S DEGREE AT A COMMUNITY COLLEGE IN THE
STATE; OR
(III) The date that the individual is awarded an associate’s degree.
(2) A community college may extend the duration of an award for an
allowable interruption of study if the recipient provides to the community college
satisfactory evidence of extenuating circumstances that prevent the recipient from
continuous enrollment.
(3) Each recipient may hold the award in accordance with paragraph (1) of
this subsection only if the recipient:
(i) Continues to be eligible for in–State tuition;
(ii) 1. Continues to enroll in and complete at least 6 credits per
semester, or a sequence of credit or noncredit courses that leads to licensure or certification,
or their equivalent, as determined by the community college; or
2. Continues to participate in a registered apprenticeship
program;
(iii) Maintains a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5 on a
4.0 scale or its equivalent for the requisite credit–bearing coursework for the remainder of
the award or, failing to do so, provides to the community college satisfactory evidence of
extenuating circumstances;
(iv) Makes satisfactory progress toward a vocational certificate, a
certificate, or an associate’s degree;
(v) Continues to meet the income limitations under § 18–3603(b)(4)
of this subtitle; and
(vi) Continues to timely submit an application under § 18–3603(b)(6)
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 377
of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –